Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 9
FOREIGN LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANIES

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1990, and this part 9 was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 2003, effective July 1, 2004, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 9 prior to 2004, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

7-80-901. Foreign limited liability companies.

Part 8 of article 90 of this title, providing for the transaction of business or the conduct of activities by foreign entities, applies to foreign limited liability companies.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2275, § 193, effective July 1, 2004.

7-80-902. Registered agent - service of process.

Part 7 of article 90 of this title, providing for registered agents and service of process, applies to foreign limited liability companies.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2275, § 193, effective July 1, 2004.